Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1389.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIX-LSMALL BUSINESS HEALTH CARE PREMIUMSCONTRIBUTION TAX CREDITSection 1901-L. Scope of article.This article establishes the Small Business Health Care Premiums Contribution Tax Credit.12345678910111213141516171819202122 Section 1902-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Aggregate contribution." The total of the first $1,000 of the contribution payment per employee during the taxable year. The term shall not include any contribution payments toward an individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement that do not meet the affordability requirements as calculated by the Exchange Authority."Contribution." A payment made by a qualified taxpayer to either of the following used by an employee to pay for eligible health insurance costs:(1) An individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement.(2) A qualified small employer health reimbursement arrangement."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Eligible health insurance costs." Premiums incurred by an employee who purchases a qualified health plan through the Exchange Authority."Employee." An individual employed by a qualified taxpayer who has provided documentary evidence of the following with the Exchange Authority:(1) Residency in this Commonwealth.(2) Citizenship, lawful presence in the United States or other qualifications to purchase a health reimbursement arrangement as provided by Federal law."Exchange Authority." The Pennsylvania Health Insurance Exchange Authority that is established under 40 Pa.C.S. § 20260SB1389PN1849 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 9302(a) (relating to the Pennsylvania Health Insurance Exchange Authority) and that has established an Office of Fraud Prevention to address suspected fraud and to prevent fraud . "Health insurance provider." The term shall have the same meaning as "health insurance issuer" under 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-91(b)(2) (relating to definitions)."Health reimbursement arrangement." A tax-advantaged arrangement that reimburses individuals for eligible health insurance costs."Individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement." A type of health reimbursement arrangement funded by an employer that may be used to reimburse employees for certain health-related costs subject to a maximum fixed-dollar amount for a period of time."Pass-through entity." Any of the following:(1) A partnership as defined in section 301(n.0).(2) A Pennsylvania S corporation as defined in section 301(n.1).(3) An unincorporated entity subject to section 307.21."Qualified health plan." A health plan as defined in section 1301(a) of the Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148, 42 U.S.C. § 18021(a)) that provides health care coverage that has been certified by the Insurance Department as having met the criteria specified in 40 Pa.C.S. Chs. 91 (relating to preliminary provisions) and 93 (relating to State-based exchange) or any other health care coverage purchased through the Exchange Authority . "Qualified small employer health reimbursement arrangement." A type of health reimbursement arrangement for small business, as the term is defined in 26 U.S.C. § 9831(d)(2) (relating to 20260SB1389PN1849 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 general exceptions)."Qualified tax liability." The tax due under Article III, excluding any tax withheld by an employer from an employee."Qualified taxpayer." An individual, partnership, association or other entity that:(1) is subject to the tax imposed under Article III;(2) is required under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.) to withhold Federal income tax from wages paid to an employee; and(3) has 50 or fewer employees."Small business health care premiums contribution tax credit." The tax credit available to a qualified taxpayer under section 1903-L(a).Section 1903-L. Small business health care premiums contribution tax credit.(a) Credit.--A qualified taxpayer may claim the small business health care premiums contribution tax credit for a contribution made during the taxable year and may apply the tax credit against the qualified taxpayer's qualified tax liability.(b) Application.--A qualified taxpayer applying to claim a small business health care premiums contribution tax credit must complete and submit to the department a small business health care premiums contribution tax credit application on a form and in a manner as determined by the department. The form shall require the qualified taxpayer to provide the following:(1) The names, addresses and Social Security numbers of all employees to which the qualified taxpayer made a contribution during the taxable year.(2) The names, addresses and employer identification numbers of the health insurance providers that provided 20260SB1389PN1849 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 health insurance services to each participating employee.(3) The amount contributed to each employee's health reimbursement arrangement.(4) The aggregate contribution.(c) Amount of tax credit.--The amount of the tax credit under subsection (a) shall be equal to 100% of the aggregate contribution.Section 1904-L. Carryover, carryback, refund and assignment of credit.(a) Carryover, carryback and refund.--A qualified taxpayer is not entitled to carry forward, carry back or obtain a refund of all or a portion of an unused tax credit granted to the qualified taxpayer under this article.(b) Sale or assignment of tax credit.--A qualified taxpayer may not sell or assign a tax credit granted to the qualified taxpayer under this article.Section 1905-L. Pass-through entity.(a) Election.--The qualified taxpayer may elect in writing, according to procedures established by the department, to transfer all or a portion of the credit to shareholders, members or partners in proportion to the share of the qualified taxpayer's distributive income to which the shareholders, members or partners are entitled . (b) Limitation.--The same unused tax credit under subsection (a) may not be claimed by both the pass-through entity and a shareholder, member or partner of the pass-through entity.(c) Time.--A shareholder, member or partner of a pass-through entity under subsection (a) may only use a tax credit during a taxable year for which use of the credit is authorized. The shareholder, member or partner of the pass-through entity 20260SB1389PN1849 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may not carry forward, carry back, obtain a refund of or sell or assign the tax credit.Section 1906-L. Exclusion from classes of income.The first $5,000 in contributions made under this article to an employee's eligible health insurance costs during the taxable year may not be included in any of the classes of income enumerated under section 303.Section 1907-L. Nondiscrimination in contributions.(a) Employees.--An employee who has incurred eligible health insurance costs shall have equal opportunity to receive a contribution from the employer.(b) Duty of employers.--If an employer chooses to make contributions for the purposes of claiming the tax credit, the employer shall make equal contributions during the tax year to any employee that has eligible health insurance costs.Section 1908-L. Tax compliance.(a) Application to Article XVII-A.1.-- The provisions of Article XVII-A.1 apply to the application of this article.(b) Report.--The report for the tax credit under this article required under section 1707-A.1 shall include the following information from the Exchange Authority:(1) All of the following data relating to suspected fraud:(i) The number of suspected fraud reports received and the dollar amount during the prior calendar year.(ii) The number of fraud reports confirmed and the dollar amount during the prior calendar year.(iii) The dollar amount of advance premium tax credits provided to rescinded policies during the prior calendar year.20260SB1389PN1849 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A copy of a standardized form for insurers to report suspected fraud relating to the Exchange Authority and a policy adopted by the Exchange Authority to respond to insurer recession requests within one business day and to make a final recession determination on suspected fraud within five business days.(3) A copy of a written policy adopted by the Exchange Authority on procedures to report and resolve allegations of fraud, including the required referral of suspected fraud to the appropriate law enforcement agencies, including the Office of Attorney General, the United States Department of Justice and the Internal Revenue Service, and certification that all employees of the Exchange Authority have received antifraud training during the prior year.(4) Any procedures that have been implemented to address suspected fraud and fraud prevention during the prior calendar year.Section 1909-L. Applicability.The provisions of this article shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1389PN1849 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021